District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.12

Repealed

Registered agent as agent for service; service when no registered agent.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 184, ch. 269, § 12
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 137, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(3)
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-64, § 2(a), 31 DCR 195
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(g), 39 DCR 4863
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 1603(a), 49 DCR 11664
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.12.
1981 Ed., § 29-312.
1973 Ed., § 29-907b.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1603(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1603(a) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1603(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).